Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0505.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 151
STATEWIDE MICROPLASTICS RESEARCH AND MONITORING PLAN
Sec. 15101. (1) The department, in consultation with other
state departments and agencies and interested entities, shall
develop a statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan to
assess the occurrence of microplastics, including in plants and
animals, and the impact of microplastics on human and animal
health, the health of the Great Lakes, and the critical drinking
water supply and identify proposed solutions to address the impacts
RMH S00751'25 (S-1) uwcp8j


of microplastics, to the extent feasible.
(2) The department may enter into 1 or more contracts with
research institutions in this state, including those associated
with Grand Valley State University, Michigan State University, the
University of Michigan, Wayne State University, and other academic
and research institutions that have demonstrated expertise relating
to the effects of microplastics on the Great Lakes, for research
services that will contribute to the statewide microplastics
research and monitoring plan.
(3) The statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan
must include, but is not limited to, all the following:
(a) Strategies for developing a comprehensive plan to identify
and evaluate the ecological, health, and economic impacts
associated with microplastics in the Great Lakes.
(b) Methods for sampling, detecting, and characterizing
microplastics that are consistent with recognized standards from
scientific, peer-reviewed research or relevant agencies, including,
but not limited to, any of the following:
(i) The International Joint Commission.
(ii) The United States Environmental Protection Agency.
(iii) The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.
(iv) ASTM International.
(c) A list of the baseline concentrations of microplastics in
the Great Lakes that includes, but is not limited to, all the
following information:
(i) An assessment of the associated environmental and human
health impacts.
(ii) Solutions this state can immediately implement.
(iii) Factors that should be considered, such as microplastic
RMH S00751'25 (S-1) uwcp8j


particle age, size, shape, type, and location.
(d) Research actions that are in alignment with best practices
and actions taken by other Great Lakes states and Canada.
(e) An investigation into the sources of microplastics and the
significance of pathways related to environmental and human health
impacts of microplastics.
(f) A list of long-term research objectives and strategies for
reducing microplastics in the Great Lakes, which must be updated at
least once every 5 years and made available to the public.
(g) An impact assessment framework for microplastics
consistent with best available science and research, and based on
the best available information on exposure of microplastics to
organisms, including humans, through pathways identified under
subdivision (e).
(h) Approaches to reduce the introduction of microplastics
into the Great Lakes from significant pathways and sources, with an
emphasis on the sizes, shapes, and types of microplastics that are
associated with significant environmental and human health impacts.
(i) Recommendations for both of the following:
(i) Policy changes, including statutory changes, or additional
research that may be needed.
(ii) Solutions to control microplastic introduction into the
Great Lakes, such as source elimination, pathway intervention, and
public education and outreach.
(j) A timeline to implement the statewide microplastics
research and monitoring plan and reduce the impacts of
microplastics on the Great Lakes.
(k) A list of potential barriers to implementation that
includes estimated costs and potential funding sources.
RMH S00751'25 (S-1) uwcp8j


(4) To develop and implement the statewide microplastics
research and monitoring plan, the department may utilize existing
information and leverage ongoing federal efforts and efforts of
this state and other states, when possible.
(5) Not later than July 1, 2027, the department shall submit
the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan to the
legislature. Not later than January 30, 2029, the department shall
submit a report to the legislature regarding the implementation of
the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan.
(6) To the extent that funds are available from bonds and
other sources, including federal funds, not later than July 1,
2028, the department shall adopt and implement the statewide
microplastics research and monitoring plan.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy.
(b) "International Joint Commission" means a binational
organization established by the governments of the United States
and Canada under the Boundary Waters Treaty of 1909, and whose
responsibilities were expanded under the Great Lakes Water Quality
Agreement of 1972.
(c) "Microplastics" means solid polymeric materials that may
contain chemical additives or other substances and that are
particles less than 5,000 micrometers, in all 3 dimensions.
Microplastics do not include polymers that are derived in nature
and that have not been chemically modified, except by hydrolysis.
Final Page
RMH S00751'25 (S-1) uwcp8j